Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-707
Flags; United States; State of Nebraska; display.

The flags of the United States of America and of the State of Nebraska shall be prominently displayed on the school grounds of every public school in the state on each day that such school is in session, in accordance with the standards prescribed for the display of the flag of the United States of America. For the purposes of this section and section 79-708, public school shall mean all institutions of learning supported in whole or in part by public funds, including those providing postsecondary education.

Laws 1971, LB 218, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,128.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 381.

Americanism instruction, see section 79-724.